src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Aux

+V+Aux: IZANNOR ;

LEXICON IZANNOR

+Ind+Prs+Abs/Sg1:naiz # ;
+Ind+Prs+Abs/Sg2+ifl:haiz # ; !+Ind+Prs+Abs/hi
+Ind+Prs+Abs/Sg2:zara # ;
+Ind+Prs+Abs/Sg3:da # ;
+Ind+Prs+Abs/Pl1:gara # ;
+Ind+Prs+Abs/Pl2:zarete # ;
+Ind+Prs+Abs/Pl3:dira # ;

!prt - en
+Ind+Prt+Abs/Sg1:nintzen # ;
+Ind+Prt+Abs/Sg2+ifl:hintzen # ;
+Ind+Prt+Abs/Sg2:zinen # ;
+Ind+Prt+Abs/Sg3:zen # ;
+Ind+Prt+Abs/Pl1:ginen # ;
+Ind+Prt+Abs/Pl2:zineten # ;
+Ind+Prt+Abs/Pl3:ziren # ;

LEXICON IZANNORNORI

+Ind+Abs/Sg1:nintzai IZANNORI ;
+Ind+Abs/Sg2+ifl:hintzai IZANNORI ; !+Ind+Prs+Abs/hi
+Ind+Abs/Sg2:zintzai IZANNORI ;
+Ind+Abs/Sg3:zitzai IZANNORI ;
+Ind+Abs/Pl1:gintzaizki IZANNORI ;
+Ind+Abs/Pl2:zintzaizki IZANNORI ;
+Ind+Abs/Pl3:aitzaizki IZANNORI ;

LEXICON IZANNORI

+Dat/Sg1:%>t       PAST ; !dan before a consonant
+Dat/Sg2+ifl/m:%>k PAST ; !kian before a consonant
+Dat/Sg2+ifl/f:%>n PAST ; !
+Dat/Sg2:%>zu      PAST ;
+Dat/Sg3:%>o       PAST ;
+Dat/Pl1:%>gu      PAST ;
+Dat/Pl2:%>zuete   PAST ;
+Dat/Pl3:%>e       PAST ;

! XXX: SNM 14.2.2016: This lexicon is added to make eus compile. Replace with
! something proper.
LEXICON Mv

+V: PAST ;

LEXICON PAST

+Prt:n # ;
